District of Columbia statutes.
32-1403

Associate Director of Apprenticeship.

(a)

The Director of the Department of Employment Services shall appoint an Associate Director of Apprenticeship whose office shall have responsibility and accountability for the apprenticeship system in the District of Columbia.

(b)

(1)

The Office of Apprenticeship, Information and Training, which shall also be known as the Registration Agency, shall have the authority to approve apprenticeship registration for federal purposes.

(2)

The Office of Apprenticeship, Information and Training is authorized to supply the Associate Director of Apprenticeship and the Apprenticeship Council with the clerical, technical, and professional assistance considered essential to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter.

History

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 204, ch. 267, § 3
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(c), 62 DCR 10905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-202.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-403.
1973 Ed., § 36-123.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

The Office of the Director of Apprenticeship was abolished pursuant to § 1-202.04(d).